Massachusetts, session 194th, H3049.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following subsection:-
(yy) Sales of facial masks that fully cover the nose and mouth, facial shields that protect
the entire face, gloves made of vinyl, latex or nitrile, and smocks made of a combination of
polyester and cloth.
of 1